Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Apples

260.040.
Commissioner to enforce law — Apples exempt. [Repealed.]

260.050.
Packages of apples to be marked. [Repealed.]

260.060.
Sale or distribution of improperly marked, adulterated or misbranded apples prohibited. [Repealed.]

260.070.
Standard barrel for apples — Dimensions. [Repealed.]

260.080.
Standard grades for apples. [Repealed.]

260.090.
Minimum size of apples — Tolerances. [Repealed.]

260.100.
When apple packages deemed misbranded. [Repealed.]

260.110.
When apple packages deemed adulterated. [Repealed.]

260.120.
Guaranty relieves recipient from liability — Guarantor liable. [Repealed.]